Idaho, session 2026, H0755.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 36, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3643, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3643. ANNUAL REVIEW OF SALES TAX EXEMPTIONS -- EXPIRATION OF EXEMP-
TIONS. (1) The legislative services office shall conduct an annual review
of the exemptions provided in this chapter from the taxes imposed pursuant
to this chapter and prepare a report making recommendations to the legisla-
ture concerning whether to eliminate or revise such exemptions. The annual
review may be conducted in such a manner that fewer than all exemptions pro-
vided in this chapter are reviewed in any single year, provided that all ex-
emptions pursuant to this chapter shall be reviewed during any five (5) year
period. In conducting the annual review, the legislative services office
shall first review those exemptions scheduled to expire pursuant to subsec-
tion (4) of this section, proceeding in order from the earliest expiration
date to the latest. Such annual review and report shall include a detailed
analysis of the following criteria:
(a) The public purpose gained by the original enactment of the tax ex-
emption;
(b) The amount of revenue that the state would collect each year if the
tax exemption were repealed;
(c) The affected taxpayers who would pay additional taxes if the exemp-
tion were repealed;
(d) The nature of any public benefits or detriments that would occur if
the exemption were repealed;
(e) Whether the exemption has out-of-state beneficiaries;
(f) How long the exemption is effective;
(g) Any adverse impacts of the exemption or its elimination and whether
the benefits of continuance or elimination outweigh adverse impacts;
and
(h) Any other criteria that the legislative services office deems rele-
vant.
(2) The legislative services office shall file the report with the sen-
ate local government and taxation committee, the house revenue and taxation
committee, and the joint finance-appropriations committee no later than
February 1 of each year.


(3) The state tax commission and the Idaho department of commerce shall
provide all necessary non-privileged information requested by the legisla-
tive services office that relates to any sales tax exemption managed by each
agency.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, and ex-
cept for the exemption provided in section 63-3622C, Idaho Code, each
exemption from the taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter that is en-
acted on or after January 1, 2026, shall expire on the later of ten (10)
years after its effective date or July 1, 2027, unless the legislature
acts by law to extend or reenact the exemption prior to its expiration.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, and except
for the exemption provided in section 63-3622C, Idaho Code, each exemp-
tion from the taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter that was enacted
before January 1, 2026, shall expire on the later of ten (10) years after
its effective date or July 1, 2031, unless the legislature acts by law to
extend or reenact the exemption prior to its expiration.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.